Washington statutes.
RCW 43.376.030

State agency tribal liaison.

The position of tribal liaison within a state agency is responsible for:

(1) Assisting the state agency in developing and implementing state and agency policies that promote effective communication and collaboration between the state agency and tribal governments;

(2) Serving as a contact person with tribal governments and maintaining communication between the state agency and affected tribal governments; and

(3) Coordinating training of state agency employees in government-to-government relations.

[ 2012 c 122 s 3.]